Vermont statutes. Title 15B Uniform Interstate Family Support Act
Chapter 14. Establishment of a Support Order or Determination of Parentage

§ 1401.
Establishment of support order.

If a support order entitled to recognition under this title has not been issued, a responding tribunal of this State with personal jurisdiction over the parties may issue a support order if:

the individual seeking the order resides outside the State; or

the support enforcement agency seeking the order is located outside this State.

The tribunal may issue a temporary child support order if the tribunal determines that such an order is appropriate and the individual ordered to pay is:

a presumed father of the child;

petitioning to have his paternity adjudicated;

identified as the father of the child through genetic testing;

an alleged father who has declined to submit to genetic testing;

shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the father of the child;

an acknowledged father as provided by applicable State law;

the mother of the child; or

an individual who has been ordered to pay child support in a previous proceeding and the order has not been reversed or vacated.

Upon finding, after notice and opportunity to be heard, that an obligor owes a duty of support, the tribunal shall issue a support order directed to the obligor and may issue other orders pursuant to section 1305 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 16

, § 2, eff. June 1, 2015.

§ 1402.
Proceeding to determine parentage.

A tribunal of this State authorized to determine parentage of a child may serve as a responding tribunal in a proceeding to determine parentage of a child brought under this title or a law or procedure substantially similar to this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 16

, § 2, eff. June 1, 2015.